Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.080

Articles and bylaws filed—Certificate of incorporation issued—Revocation of right to engage in business, when.

If the director approves the incorporation of the proposed association, the director shall forthwith return two copies of the articles of incorporation and one copy of the bylaws to the incorporators, retaining the others as a part of the files of the director's office. The incorporators, thereupon, shall file one set of the articles with the secretary of state and retain the other set of the articles of incorporation and the bylaws as a part of its minute records, paying to the secretary of state such fees and charges as are required by law. Upon receiving an original set of the approved articles of incorporation, duly endorsed by the director as herein provided, together with the required fees, the secretary of state shall issue the secretary of state's certificate of incorporation and deliver the same to the incorporators, whereupon the corporate existence of the association shall begin. Unless an association whose articles of incorporation and bylaws have been approved by the director shall engage in business within two years from the date of such approval, its right to engage in business shall be deemed revoked and of no effect. In the director's discretion, the two-year period in which the association must commence business may be extended for a reasonable period of time, which shall not exceed one additional year.

[ 1994 c 92 s 431; 1982 c 3 s 19; 1981 c 302 s 31; 1945 c 235 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-128. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 8; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 2; 1919 c 169 s 2; 1913 c 110 s 3; 1890 p 56 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.